Hawaii statutes.
§612-9 Certificate for jury pay. At
least once each month, the clerk shall certify the number of days each juror or
prospective juror has attended court and the amount due to the juror or
prospective juror. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2007, c 122, §6]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next